Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-298
Commitment of juvenile; religious preference considered.

The court in committing juveniles under the Nebraska Juvenile Code shall place them as far as practicable in the care and custody of some individual holding the same religious belief as the parents of the juvenile or with some association which is controlled by persons of like religious faith of the parents of the juvenile.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 54;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 29.